Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.650

Use of restraints on pregnant youth in custody—Allowed in extraordinary circumstances.

(1) Except in extraordinary circumstances, no restraints of any kind may be used on any pregnant youth in an institution or detention facility covered by this chapter during transportation to and from visits to medical providers and court proceedings during the third trimester of her pregnancy, or during postpartum recovery. For purposes of this section, "extraordinary circumstances" exist where an employee at an institution or detention facility makes an individualized determination that restraints are necessary to prevent an incarcerated pregnant youth from escaping, or from injuring herself, medical or correctional personnel, or others. In the event the employee of the institution or detention facility determines that extraordinary circumstances exist and restraints are used, the employee of the institution or detention facility must fully document in writing the reasons that he or she determined such extraordinary circumstances existed such that restraints were used. As part of this documentation, the employee of the institution or detention facility must also include the kind of restraints used and the reasons those restraints were considered the least restrictive available and the most reasonable under the circumstances.

(2) While the pregnant youth is in labor or in childbirth no restraints of any kind may be used. Nothing in this section affects the use of hospital restraints requested for the medical safety of a patient by treating physicians licensed under Title 18 RCW.

(3) Anytime restraints are permitted to be used on a pregnant youth, the restraints must be the least restrictive available and the most reasonable under the circumstances, but in no case shall leg irons or waist chains be used on any youth known to be pregnant.

(4) No employee of the institution or detention facility shall be present in the room during the pregnant youth's labor or childbirth, unless specifically requested by medical personnel. If the employee's presence is requested by medical personnel, the employee should be female, if practicable.

(5) If the doctor, nurse, or other health professional treating the pregnant youth requests that restraints not be used, the employee of the institution or detention facility accompanying the pregnant youth shall immediately remove all restraints.

[ 2010 c 181 s 11.]